Hawaii statutes.
§425-19 Designation or change of registered
agent. (a) A partnership that does not already have a registered agent shall
designate its registered agent by complying with the requirements of section
425R-4.

(b) A partnership may change its registered agent
by complying with the requirements of section 425R-7.

(c) If the registered agent changes its name,
its address, or its type or jurisdiction of organization, the agent shall
comply with the requirements of section 425R-8 or 425R-9, whichever is applicable.
[L 2002, c 130, pt of §5; am L 2009, c 55, §33]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next